Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.887

Scrap metal no-buy list database program—Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs not liable for civil damages.

The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall not be held liable for civil damages resulting from any act or omission in carrying out the requirements of RCW 43.43.885 other than an act or omission constituting gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.

[ 2013 c 322 s 33.]